Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1247.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-407.04, to read: START_STATUTE36-407.04. Assisted living centers; assisted living homes; occupants; prohibitions Notwithstanding section 36-407, subsection A and if allowed by an assisted living center or an assisted living home, an individual who does not receive supervisory care services, personal care services or directed care services may live with a resident in the assisted living center or assisted living home in the resident's unit or may live in any other unit within the assisted living center or assisted living home.  The department may not: 1. place any requirement on that individual with which a resident would not need to comply. 2. Require that individual to have a service plan or to receive supervisory care services, personal care services or directed care services. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Emergency This act is an emergency measure that is necessary to preserve the public peace, health or safety and is operative immediately as provided by law. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 6, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 6, 2026.